trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 45307
	Sdefs: 11
	Paradigms: 370

-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="ut" /> 
		<sdef n="p" /> 
		<sdef n="v" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" /> 
		<sdef n="nom" /> 
		<sdef n="def" /> 
		<sdef n="ind" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>

<pardef n="S__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="skinhead__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vän__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nerna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rom__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rum__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cent/er__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rerna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="distik/on__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>onet</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onen</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="efor/us__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sari__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ör__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="strömh/opp__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>opp</l>       <r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ppet</l>      <r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oppet</l>     <r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>opp</l>       <r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ppen</l>      <r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oppen</l>     <r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="i__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="etage__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="konstruktionslexikon"><i>konstruktionslexik</i><par n="distik/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skyddsrum">       <i>skyddsrum</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dokumentärprogram"><i>dokumentärprogram</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="konversationslexikon"><i>konversationslexik</i><par n="distik/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="barnhem">         <i>barnhem</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="rimlexikon">      <i>rimlexik</i><par n="distik/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mikrofiche">      <i>mikrofiche</i><par n="etage__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="bergrum">         <i>bergrum</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="stolpdiagram">    <i>stolpdiagram</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kapprum">         <i>kapprum</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="featureprogram">  <i>featureprogram</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="distikon">        <i>distik</i><par n="distik/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="etage">           <i>etage</i><par n="etage__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="enkelrum">        <i>enkelrum</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sari">            <i>sari</i><par n="sari__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="i">               <i>i</i><par n="i__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bubbelgum">       <i>bubbelgum</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="safari">          <i>safari</i><par n="sari__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kardiogram">      <i>kardiogram</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="flödesdiagram">   <i>flödesdiagram</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="klassrum">        <i>klassrum</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="patronymikon">    <i>patronymik</i><par n="distik/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="triage">          <i>triage</i><par n="etage__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="guru">            <i>guru</i><par n="sari__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="läsrum">          <i>läsrum</i><par n="rum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skinhead">        <i>skinhead</i><par n="skinhead__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ungdomsvän">      <i>ungdomsvän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hjärtevän">       <i>hjärtevän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pojkvän">         <i>pojkvän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="körsven">         <i>körsven</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="strömhopp">       <i>strömh</i><par n="strömh/opp__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="pingstvän">       <i>pingstvän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="brevvän">         <i>brevvän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="flickvän">        <i>flickvän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="naturvän">        <i>naturvän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="människovän">     <i>människovän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="djurvän">         <i>djurvän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sven">            <i>sven</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vän">             <i>vän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ovän">            <i>ovän</i><par n="vän__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="eforus">          <i>efor</i><par n="efor/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hälsocenter">     <i>hälsocent</i><par n="cent/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="center">          <i>cent</i><par n="cent/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="säkerhetspolitik"><i>säkerhetspolitik</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fiskrom">         <i>fiskrom</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sockerrot">       <i>sockerrot</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lungbrand">       <i>lungbrand</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gråkil">          <i>gråkil</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="uppvärmningsström"><i>uppvärmningsström</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hälsovård">       <i>hälsovård</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kallpermanent">   <i>kallpermanent</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="grytfot">         <i>grytfot</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="skam">            <i>skam</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="finsprit">        <i>finsprit</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="äppelblom">       <i>äppelblom</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="talteknik">       <i>talteknik</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lysol">           <i>lysol</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="löjrom">          <i>löjrom</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blodskam">        <i>blodskam</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="riksgäld">        <i>riksgäld</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="rom">             <i>rom</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blom">            <i>blom</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="myntfot">         <i>myntfot</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="slum">            <i>slum</i><par n="rom__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="talarkonst">      <i>talarkonst</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
